Utah statutes.
73-4-20.   Revolving fund -- Money expended not assessable against water users -- Transfer of unexpended money to adjudication fund -- Payment of costs of determinations -- Money expended from adjudication fund not assessable against water users -- Surplus to remain in adjudication fund.

Money heretofore expended from the state engineer's revolving fund in pending adjudications shall not be assessable against the water users. All money remaining and unexpended in the state engineer's revolving fund as of July 1, 1953, including money appropriated to the revolving fund for the biennium ending June 30, 1955, shall be transferred to a fund of the state engineer to be known as the adjudication fund. The revolving fund shall be closed out upon such transfer of money. The state engineer shall pay all costs of determinations with money appropriated to the office of the state engineer and deposited in the adjudication fund and with money transferred to such fund as provided above. The money expended from such fund shall not be assessable against the water users. Any money remaining in such fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the adjudication fund until expended.

